Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.150

Fees—Conferences, workshops, training.

The department is authorized to charge reasonable fees to cover costs for conferences, workshops, and training purposes and to expend those fees for the purposes for which they were collected.

[ 1994 c 284 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1994 c 284: See RCW 43.22A.901.